Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-617
Suspension, revocation, or conviction; court; duties.

The court shall notify the commission of any suspension, revocation, or conviction under sections 37-614 to 37-616.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 307;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 90;

Laws 2017, LB566, § 6.